lexd_components/hye-eanc_names.lexd
# eanc names from noun lexeme list

LEXICON NameMaleGiven
Գագո:Գագո
Գուգո:Գուգո
Հայկո:Հայկո
Հովո:Հովո
Ռաֆո:Ռաֆո
Գագո:Գագո
Գուգո:Գուգո
Հայկո:Հայկո
Հովո:Հովո
Ռաֆո:Ռաֆո
Ռուդոլֆ:Ռուդոլֆ
Եղիա:Եղիա
Երեմիա:Երեմիա
Անանիա:Անանիա
Ամասիա:Ամասիա
Ազարիա:Ազարիա
Զաքարիա:Զաքարիա
Մաղաքիա:Մաղաքիա
Միկա:Միկա
Վոլոդյա:Վոլոդյա
Հրաչյա:Հրաչյա
Միտյա:Միտյա
Սաշա:Սաշա
Միշա:Միշա
Գրիշա:Գրիշա
Ալյոշա:Ալյոշա
Եհովա:Եհովա
Սայաթ-Նովա:Սայաթ-Նովա
Արա:Արա
Շարա:Շարա
Ժորա:Ժորա
Արքա:Արքա
Զոհրաբ:Զոհրաբ
Հակոբ:Հակոբ
Սերոբ:Սերոբ
Քերոբ:Քերոբ
Ավագ:Ավագ
Վարագ:Վարագ
Արեգ:Արեգ
Լյուդվիգ:Լյուդվիգ
Բերինգ:Բերինգ
Գևորգ:Գևորգ
Մուրադ:Մուրադ
Արամազդ:Արամազդ
Արտավազդ:Արտավազդ
Լեոնիդ:Լեոնիդ
Բուզանդ:Բուզանդ
Երվանդ:Երվանդ
Ղևոնդ:Ղևոնդ
Ռիչարդ:Ռիչարդ
Նավասարդ:Նավասարդ
Էդվարդ:Էդվարդ
Մահմուդ:Մահմուդ
Սերովբե:Սերովբե
Քերովբե:Քերովբե
Պարթե:Պարթե
Վահե:Վահե
Եղիշե:Եղիշե
Վաչե:Վաչե
Մանասե:Մանասե
Մամբրե:Մամբրե
Անդրե:Անդրե
Հայկազ:Հայկազ
Ասքանազ:Ասքանազ
Շիրազ:Շիրազ
Սայաթ:Սայաթ
Հաբեթ:Հաբեթ
Սեթ:Սեթ
Մելիքսեթ:Մելիքսեթ
Դավիթ:Դավիթ
Դավիթ:Դավիթ
Տիրիթ:Տիրիթ
Հաբութ:Հաբութ
Հարութ:Հարութ
Նեմրութ:Նեմրութ
Վրեժ:Վրեժ
Սերժ:Սերժ
Գեորգի:Գեորգի
Եսայի:Եսայի
Աղասի:Աղասի
Աղասի:Աղասի
Լավրենտի:Լավրենտի
Վալերի:Վալերի
Նաիրի:Նաիրի
Անրի:Անրի
Հենրի:Հենրի
Դմիտրի:Դմիտրի
Յուրի:Յուրի
Խորենացի:Խորենացի
Խորենացի:Խորենացի
Րաֆֆի:Րաֆֆի
Հաննիբալ:Հաննիբալ
Աբել:Աբել
Սաղաթել:Սաղաթել
Եզեկիել:Եզեկիել
Դանիել:Դանիել
Գաբրիել:Գաբրիել
Միքայել:Միքայել
Ռաֆայել:Ռաֆայել
Գնել:Գնել
Պավել:Պավել
Պավել:Պավել
Սամվել:Սամվել
Մանվել:Մանվել
Էմանվել:Էմանվել
Առաքել:Առաքել
Միխայիլ:Միխայիլ
Վասիլ:Վասիլ
Շառլ:Շառլ
Կարլ:Կարլ
Շարլ:Շարլ
Թաթուլ:Թաթուլ
Մայքլ:Մայքլ
Փայլակ:Փայլակ
Ցոլակ:Ցոլակ
Մեխակ:Մեխակ
Սահակ:Սահակ
Իսահակ:Իսահակ
Ընձակ:Ընձակ
Հմայակ:Հմայակ
Արմենակ:Արմենակ
Վաղինակ:Վաղինակ
Արշակ:Արշակ
Վաղարշակ:Վաղարշակ
Վասակ:Վասակ
Գիսակ:Գիսակ
Միսակ:Միսակ
Արտակ:Արտակ
Սպարտակ:Սպարտակ
Սեդրակ:Սեդրակ
Շիրակ:Շիրակ
Սևակ:Սևակ
Նարեկ:Նարեկ
Համբիկ:Համբիկ
Ռուբիկ:Ռուբիկ
Գագիկ:Գագիկ
Էդիկ:Էդիկ
Ֆրունզիկ:Ֆրունզիկ
Արցախիկ:Արցախիկ
Չմշկիկ:Չմշկիկ
Ռոմիկ:Ռոմիկ
Արայիկ:Արայիկ
Անանիկ:Անանիկ
Վանիկ:Վանիկ
Ոստանիկ:Ոստանիկ
Անդրանիկ:Անդրանիկ
Բենիկ:Բենիկ
Դերենիկ:Դերենիկ
Ձոնիկ:Ձոնիկ
Գառնիկ:Գառնիկ
Թոռնիկ:Թոռնիկ
Խաչիկ:Խաչիկ
Վաչիկ:Վաչիկ
Քաջիկ:Քաջիկ
Ջոջիկ:Ջոջիկ
Հովիկ:Հովիկ
Մարտիկ:Մարտիկ
Ժիրիկ:Ժիրիկ
Հենրիկ:Հենրիկ
Զորիկ:Զորիկ
Նորիկ:Նորիկ
Պատրիկ:Պատրիկ
Սուրիկ:Սուրիկ
Ֆրիկ:Ֆրիկ
Ռաֆիկ:Ռաֆիկ
Հայկ:Հայկ
Շվեյկ:Շվեյկ
Կուկ:Կուկ
Ծառուկ:Ծառուկ
Վռամշապուհ:Վռամշապուհ
Մուշեղ:Մուշեղ
Բարսեղ:Բարսեղ
Բարդուղ:Բարդուղ
Վահրիճ:Վահրիճ
Պերճ:Պերճ
Արգամ:Արգամ
Ադամ:Ադամ
Աբրահամ:Աբրահամ
Իլհամ:Իլհամ
Գեղամ:Գեղամ
Արշամ:Արշամ
Վռամ:Վռամ
Առուստամ:Առուստամ
Արամ:Արամ
Վահրամ:Վահրամ
Արտեմ:Արտեմ
Եփրեմ:Եփրեմ
Հովակիմ:Հովակիմ
Մաքսիմ:Մաքսիմ
Թորգոմ:Թորգոմ
Աբիսողոմ:Աբիսողոմ
Արտյոմ:Արտյոմ
Ռոստոմ:Ռոստոմ
Արմ:Արմ
Ամբակում:Ամբակում
Համբարձում:Համբարձում
Մկրտում:Մկրտում
Նիկոլայ:Նիկոլայ
Սերգեյ:Սերգեյ
Ֆադեյ:Ֆադեյ
Ալեքսեյ:Ալեքսեյ
Անդրեյ:Անդրեյ
Նոյ:Նոյ
Վաչագան:Վաչագան
Վարդան:Վարդան
Ջորդան:Ջորդան
Նաթան:Նաթան
Մերուաժան:Մերուաժան
Մերուժան:Մերուժան
Իշխան:Իշխան
Պատվական:Պատվական
Մնացական:Մնացական
Ոսկան:Ոսկան
Վահան:Վահան
Հովհան:Հովհան
Օհան:Օհան
Ռոման:Ռոման
Արման:Արման
Արզուման:Արզուման
Երեմյան:Երեմյան
Սարգսյան:Սարգսյան
Ավետիսյան:Ավետիսյան
Մաղաքյան:Մաղաքյան
Նշան:Նշան
Առուշան:Առուշան
Ստեպան:Ստեպան
Սասան:Սասան
Ալեքսան:Ալեքսան
Վան:Վան
Անուշավան:Անուշավան
Իվան:Իվան
Կոստան:Կոստան
Տիգրան:Տիգրան
Տիրան:Տիրան
Միհրան:Միհրան
Սեյրան:Սեյրան
Վարդևան:Վարդևան
Ստեփան:Ստեփան
Սիփան:Սիփան
Վահագն:Վահագն
Ռուբեն:Ռուբեն
Վազգեն:Վազգեն
Վիգեն:Վիգեն
Գուրգեն:Գուրգեն
Առլեն:Առլեն
Բաբկեն:Բաբկեն
Շահեն:Շահեն
էռմեն:էռմեն
Սեն:Սեն
Արսեն:Արսեն
Զավեն:Զավեն
Սթիվեն:Սթիվեն
Կարեն:Կարեն
Խորեն:Խորեն
Սուրեն:Սուրեն
Գարեգին:Գարեգին
Բենիամին:Բենիամին
էմին:էմին
Կոնստանտին:Կոնստանտին
Նապոլեոն:Նապոլեոն
Պիոն:Պիոն
Մամիկոն:Մամիկոն
Սիմոն:Սիմոն
Սողոմոն:Սողոմոն
Ջոն:Ջոն
Սամսոն:Սամսոն
Շմավոն:Շմավոն
Անտոն:Անտոն
Ահարոն:Ահարոն
Տարոն:Տարոն
Լևոն:Լևոն
Մելքոն:Մելքոն
Հայկազուն:Հայկազուն
Հարություն:Հարություն
Արծրուն:Արծրուն
Շավարշ:Շավարշ
Բուշ:Բուշ
Մուշ:Մուշ
Սերգո:Սերգո
Ռոմեո:Ռոմեո
Վաղո:Վաղո
Համո:Համո
Կարո:Կարո
Սարո:Սարո
Հրաչ:Հրաչ
Մկրտիչ:Մկրտիչ
Մուկուչ:Մուկուչ
Պապ:Պապ
Մեսրոպ:Մեսրոպ
Համազասպ:Համազասպ
Ջորջ:Ջորջ
Պիեռ:Պիեռ
Գոռ:Գոռ
Անդրեաս:Անդրեաս
Սուքիաս:Սուքիաս
Ղուկաս:Ղուկաս
Թոմաս:Թոմաս
Թովմաս:Թովմաս
Աթանաս:Աթանաս
Մինաս:Մինաս
Կոմիտաս:Կոմիտաս
Անաստաս:Անաստաս
Եզրաս:Եզրաս
Վարդգես:Վարդգես
Արիստակես:Արիստակես
Աթանես:Աթանես
Վրթանես:Վրթանես
Օհանես:Օհանես
Հովհաննես:Հովհաննես
Արտաշես:Արտաշես
Մովսես:Մովսես
Ներսես:Ներսես
Սարգիս:Սարգիս
Սարգիս:Սարգիս
Արամայիս:Արամայիս
Մասիս:Մասիս
Թեոդոս:Թեոդոս
Նարդոս:Նարդոս
Բարդուղիմեոս:Բարդուղիմեոս
Կարլոս:Կարլոս
Կիրակոս:Կիրակոս
Մարկոս:Մարկոս
Նիկողոս:Նիկողոս
Պողոս:Պողոս
Կադմոս:Կադմոս
Նիկողայոս:Նիկողայոս
Ռոմանոս:Ռոմանոս
Երանոս:Երանոս
Փանոս:Փանոս
Ստեփանոս:Ստեփանոս
Փիլիպոս:Փիլիպոս
Քրիստոս:Քրիստոս
Ղազարոս:Ղազարոս
Վարոս:Վարոս
Մարտիրոս:Մարտիրոս
Թեոդորոս:Թեոդորոս
Թորոս:Թորոս
Պետրոս:Պետրոս
Թադևոս:Թադևոս
Մաթևոս:Մաթևոս
Հիսուս:Հիսուս
Ֆելիքս:Ֆելիքս
Օբլոմով:Օբլոմով
Խոսրով:Խոսրով
Սմբատ:Սմբատ
Վարազդատ:Վարազդատ
Միհրդատ:Միհրդատ
Տրդատ:Տրդատ
Ազատ:Ազատ
Տաճատ:Տաճատ
Դրաստամատ:Դրաստամատ
Արարատ:Արարատ
Բագրատ:Բագրատ
Սոկրատ:Սոկրատ
Համլետ:Համլետ
Նահապետ:Նահապետ
Տոնապետ:Տոնապետ
Կարապետ:Կարապետ
Ասպետ:Ասպետ
Լիպարիտ:Լիպարիտ
Պանդուխտ:Պանդուխտ
Հրանտ:Հրանտ
Աշոտ:Աշոտ
Գալուստ:Գալուստ
Մոցարտ:Մոցարտ
Ալբերտ:Ալբերտ
Գիլբերտ:Գիլբերտ
Ռոբերտ:Ռոբերտ
Գյուտ:Գյուտ
Աբգար:Աբգար
Էդգար:Էդգար
Մարգար:Մարգար
Հեյդար:Հեյդար
Եղիազար:Եղիազար
Ղազար:Ղազար
Նազար:Նազար
Մխիթար:Մխիթար
Բեռնար:Բեռնար
Գասպար:Գասպար
Բաղդասար:Բաղդասար
Սանասար:Սանասար
Զաքար:Զաքար
Ալեքսանդր:Ալեքսանդր
Հիտլեր:Հիտլեր
Մհեր:Մհեր
Խաչեր:Խաչեր
Լուսեր:Լուսեր
Նվեր:Նվեր
Վլադիմիր:Վլադիմիր
Արշավիր:Արշավիր
Քաջայր:Քաջայր
Ժիրայր:Ժիրայր
Տիրայր:Տիրայր
Հրայր:Հրայր
Նորայր:Նորայր
Պարույր:Պարույր
Վրույր:Վրույր
Իգոր:Իգոր
Գրիգոր:Գրիգոր
Վիկտոր:Վիկտոր
Քրիստափոր:Քրիստափոր
Ազնաուր:Ազնաուր
Արթուր:Արթուր
Ծատուր:Ծատուր
Աստվածատուր:Աստվածատուր
Մեծատուր:Մեծատուր
Խաչատուր:Խաչատուր
Ասատուր:Ասատուր
Տիրատուր:Տիրատուր
Չարենց:Չարենց
Մաշտոց:Մաշտոց
Պարգև:Պարգև
Մեթյու:Մեթյու
Անդրե:Անդրե
Սայաթ:Սայաթ
Արմ:Արմ
Առլեն:Առլեն
Հովսեփ:Հովսեփ
Միսաք:Միսաք
Սիրաք:Սիրաք
Մելիք:Մելիք
Ավետիք:Ավետիք
Ենոք:Ենոք
Երջանիկ:Երջանիկ
Եզնիկ:Եզնիկ
Գարուն:Գարուն
Արշալույս:Արշալույս
Նուբար:Նուբար

LEXICON NameFemaleGiven
Դոնարա:Դոնարա
Նարինե:Նարինե
Նառա:Նառա
Լիլո:Լիլո
Հասո:Հասո
Քիսո:Քիսո
Ալիս:Ալիս
Դոնար:Դոնար
Նառա:Նառա
Լիլո:Լիլո
Հասո:Հասո
Քիսո:Քիսո
Ալիս:Ալիս
Դոնար:Դոնար
Սյուզի:Սյուզի
Սիրարփի:Սիրարփի
Սոֆի:Սոֆի
Երջանիկ:Երջանիկ
Եզնիկ:Եզնիկ
Գարուն:Գարուն
Արշալույս:Արշալույս
Նուբար:Նուբար
Օլգա:Օլգա
Ադա:Ադա
Սեդա:Սեդա
Ադելաիդա:Ադելաիդա
Լիդա:Լիդա
Ֆրիդա:Ֆրիդա
Մեդեա:Մեդեա
Թերեզա:Թերեզա
Լիզա:Լիզա
Ռոզա:Ռոզա
Ագաթա:Ագաթա
Մարթա:Մարթա
Լիա:Լիա
Մարիա:Մարիա
Լալա:Լալա
Անժելա:Անժելա
Անջելա:Անջելա
Պաոլա:Պաոլա
Ուրսուլա:Ուրսուլա
Ընծա:Ընծա
Ռեբեկա:Ռեբեկա
Ջեմմա:Ջեմմա
Էմմա:Էմմա
Ռոզալյա:Ռոզալյա
Ամալյա:Ամալյա
Հերսելյա:Հերսելյա
Օֆելյա:Օֆելյա
Մելանյա:Մելանյա
Մանյա:Մանյա
Ժենյա:Ժենյա
Երմոնյա:Երմոնյա
Ասյա:Ասյա
Լյուսյա:Լյուսյա
Մետաքսյա:Մետաքսյա
Արաքսյա:Արաքսյա
Եպրաքսյա:Եպրաքսյա
Վիկտորյա:Վիկտորյա
Սոֆյա:Սոֆյա
Լիանա:Լիանա
Սվետլանա:Սվետլանա
Նանա:Նանա
Մանանա:Մանանա
Ելենա:Ելենա
Էվելինա:Էվելինա
Նինա:Նինա
Կատերինա:Կատերինա
Իրինա:Իրինա
Աննա:Աննա
Սյուզաննա:Սյուզաննա
Ռուզաննա:Ռուզաննա
Ժաննա:Ժաննա
Ովսաննա:Ովսաննա
Սուսաննա:Սուսաննա
Սոնա:Սոնա
Նատաշա:Նատաշա
Սառա:Սառա
Լարիսա:Լարիսա
Եվա:Եվա
Սիլվա:Սիլվա
Ջուլիետա:Ջուլիետա
Մարիետա:Մարիետա
Ռիտա:Ռիտա
Մարգարիտա:Մարգարիտա
Ռոզետտա:Ռոզետտա
Ռոբերտա:Ռոբերտա
Դոնարա:Դոնարա
Նաիրա:Նաիրա
Դորա:Դորա
Ֆլորա:Ֆլորա
Էլեոնորա:Էլեոնորա
Կլեոպատրա:Կլեոպատրա
Լուսնթագ:Լուսնթագ
Սիրամարգ:Սիրամարգ
Հնազանդ:Հնազանդ
Հրավարդ:Հրավարդ
Ալվարդ:Ալվարդ
Նվարդ:Նվարդ
Սիրվարդ:Սիրվարդ
Բերսաբե:Բերսաբե
Հռիփսիմե:Հռիփսիմե
Մանե:Մանե
Գայանե:Գայանե
Նանե:Նանե
Անգինե:Անգինե
Եվգինե:Եվգինե
Վերգինե:Վերգինե
Մելինե:Մելինե
Մագթաղինե:Մագթաղինե
Հեղինե:Հեղինե
Արմինե:Արմինե
Հերմինե:Հերմինե
Լուսինե:Լուսինե
Քրիստինե:Քրիստինե
Կարինե:Կարինե
Մարինե:Մարինե
Նարինե:Նարինե
Ադրինե:Ադրինե
Հերմոնե:Հերմոնե
Նունե:Նունե
Բեատրիչե:Բեատրիչե
Վառվառե:Վառվառե
Սոսե:Սոսե
Կալիպսե:Կալիպսե
Աֆրոդիտե:Աֆրոդիտե
Շաքե:Շաքե
Հերիքնազ:Հերիքնազ
Նարգիզ:Նարգիզ
Շողակաթ:Շողակաթ
Եղիսաբեթ:Եղիսաբեթ
Ասանեթ:Ասանեթ
Լիլիթ:Լիլիթ
Զվարթ:Զվարթ
Խանդութ:Խանդութ
Սյուզի:Սյուզի
Նազելի:Նազելի
Լիլի:Լիլի
Նելլի:Նելլի
Անի:Անի
Նազանի:Նազանի
Վարդենի:Վարդենի
Աղավնի:Աղավնի
Ագապի:Ագապի
Սոսի:Սոսի
Արաքսի:Արաքսի
Մերի:Մերի
Քերրի:Քերրի
Արփի:Արփի
Սիրարփի:Սիրարփի
Հրարփի:Հրարփի
Սոֆի:Սոֆի
Զաբել:Զաբել
Ադել:Ադել
Ոսկեթել:Ոսկեթել
Միշել:Միշել
Մանյակ:Մանյակ
Երանյակ:Երանյակ
Արուսյակ:Արուսյակ
Մանուշակ:Մանուշակ
Նազիկ:Նազիկ
Երազիկ:Երազիկ
Պարզիկ:Պարզիկ
Անժիկ:Անժիկ
Թուխիկ:Թուխիկ
Չնաշխարհիկ:Չնաշխարհիկ
Ծաղիկ:Ծաղիկ
Շաղիկ:Շաղիկ
Շողիկ:Շողիկ
Ցողիկ:Ցողիկ
Աստղիկ:Աստղիկ
Պերճիկ:Պերճիկ
Ծամիկ:Ծամիկ
Հասմիկ:Հասմիկ
Անիկ:Անիկ
Դեղձանիկ:Դեղձանիկ
Նանիկ:Նանիկ
Շուշանիկ:Շուշանիկ
Սաթենիկ:Սաթենիկ
Ժենիկ:Ժենիկ
Վարսենիկ:Վարսենիկ
Արփենիկ:Արփենիկ
Այծեմնիկ:Այծեմնիկ
Ձայնիկ:Ձայնիկ
Փայլունիկ:Փայլունիկ
Գարունիկ:Գարունիկ
Սիրունիկ:Սիրունիկ
Թուշիկ:Թուշիկ
Նուշիկ:Նուշիկ
Անուշիկ:Անուշիկ
Շուշիկ:Շուշիկ
Քնքուշիկ:Քնքուշիկ
Եղսիկ:Եղսիկ
Վարսիկ:Վարսիկ
Հերսիկ:Հերսիկ
Լուսիկ:Լուսիկ
Սուսիկ:Սուսիկ
Կաքավիկ:Կաքավիկ
Ծովիկ:Ծովիկ
Զարդարիկ:Զարդարիկ
Գոհարիկ:Գոհարիկ
Քնարիկ:Քնարիկ
Սերիկ:Սերիկ
Շամրիկ:Շամրիկ
Դստրիկ:Դստրիկ
Հուրիկ:Հուրիկ
Գեղեցիկ:Գեղեցիկ
Արևիկ:Արևիկ
Արփիկ:Արփիկ
Օֆիկ:Օֆիկ
Խոնարհ:Խոնարհ
Մագթաղ:Մագթաղ
Շարմաղ:Շարմաղ
Վարդիշաղ:Վարդիշաղ
Մարիամ:Մարիամ
Ոսկեծամ:Ոսկեծամ
Թուխծամ:Թուխծամ
Սանամ:Սանամ
Անթառամ:Անթառամ
Շամիրամ:Շամիրամ
Շահասպրամ:Շահասպրամ
Համասպրամ:Համասպրամ
Բեթղեհեմ:Բեթղեհեմ
Փառանձեմ:Փառանձեմ
Նոյեմ:Նոյեմ
Արեգնազան:Արեգնազան
Ռուզան:Ռուզան
Ծիածան:Ծիածան
Ռեհան:Ռեհան
Աննման:Աննման
Շուշան:Շուշան
Մարջան:Մարջան
Սուսան:Սուսան
Բուրաստան:Բուրաստան
Սիրան:Սիրան
Լյուսիեն:Լյուսիեն
Աշխեն:Աշխեն
Անգին:Անգին
Հրածին:Հրածին
Բյուրակն:Բյուրակն
Նախշուն:Նախշուն
Ազգուշ:Ազգուշ
Վարդուշ:Վարդուշ
Հայկուշ:Հայկուշ
Անուշ:Անուշ
Ազգանուշ:Ազգանուշ
Վարդանուշ:Վարդանուշ
Հայկանուշ:Հայկանուշ
Վեհանուշ:Վեհանուշ
Գեղանուշ:Գեղանուշ
Պերճանուշ:Պերճանուշ
Արմանուշ:Արմանուշ
Նանուշ:Նանուշ
Սիրանուշ:Սիրանուշ
Հրանուշ:Հրանուշ
Մեղրանուշ:Մեղրանուշ
Սիրուշ:Սիրուշ
Քնքուշ:Քնքուշ
Մարգո:Մարգո
Դշխո:Դշխո
Անո:Անո
Նանո:Նանո
Փառո:Փառո
Մարո:Մարո
Պայծառ:Պայծառ
Զեփյուռ:Զեփյուռ
Համասփյուռ:Համասփյուռ
Արուս:Արուս
Կաքավ:Կաքավ
Ազնիվ:Ազնիվ
Ոսկեհատ:Ոսկեհատ
Անահիտ:Անահիտ
Մարգարիտ:Մարգարիտ
Սանդուխտ:Սանդուխտ
Զմրուխտ:Զմրուխտ
Ալմաստ:Ալմաստ
Համեստ:Համեստ
Քրիստ:Քրիստ
Զարդար:Զարդար
Գոհար:Գոհար
Թամար:Թամար
Խումար:Խումար
Ոսկինար:Ոսկինար
Ծովինար:Ծովինար
Հեղնար:Հեղնար
Քնար:Քնար
Նունուֆար:Նունուֆար
Վարդիթեր:Վարդիթեր
Էսթեր:Էսթեր
Ոսկեհեր:Ոսկեհեր
Շողեր:Շողեր
Ջավահիր:Ջավահիր

LEXICON NameFemaleGivenIFinalBase
Նարեկացի:Նարեկացի
Սրբուհի:Սրբուհի
Թագուհի:Թագուհի
Վարդուհի:Վարդուհի
Վրեժուհի:Վրեժուհի
Դշխուհի:Դշխուհի
Արշակուհի:Արշակուհի
Հայկուհի:Հայկուհի
Իսկուհի:Իսկուհի
Գեղուհի:Գեղուհի
Պերճուհի:Պերճուհի
Զարմուհի:Զարմուհի
Տիգբանուհի:Տիգբանուհի
Իշխանուհի:Իշխանուհի
Վանուհի:Վանուհի
Երանուհի:Երանուհի
Արմենուհի:Արմենուհի
Հրաչուհի:Հրաչուհի
Ֆրանսուհի:Ֆրանսուհի
Ազատուհի:Ազատուհի
Դրախտուհի:Դրախտուհի
Վշտուհի:Վշտուհի
Զարուհի:Զարուհի
Սիրուհի:Սիրուհի
Տիրուհի:Տիրուհի
Մաքրուհի:Մաքրուհի
Աղավնի:Աղավնի

LEXICON NameFemaleGivenIFinalReduced
Նարեկացի:Նարեկաց
Սրբուհի:Սրբուհ
Թագուհի:Թագուհ
Վարդուհի:Վարդուհ
Վրեժուհի:Վրեժուհ
Դշխուհի:Դշխուհ
Արշակուհի:Արշակուհ
Հայկուհի:Հայկուհ
Իսկուհի:Իսկուհ
Գեղուհի:Գեղուհ
Պերճուհի:Պերճուհ
Զարմուհի:Զարմուհ
Տիգբանուհի:Տիգբանուհ
Իշխանուհի:Իշխանուհ
Վանուհի:Վանուհ
Երանուհի:Երանուհ
Արմենուհի:Արմենուհ
Հրաչուհի:Հրաչուհ
Ֆրանսուհի:Ֆրանսուհ
Ազատուհի:Ազատուհ
Դրախտուհի:Դրախտուհ
Վշտուհի:Վշտուհ
Զարուհի:Զարուհ
Սիրուհի:Սիրուհ
Տիրուհի:Տիրուհ
Մաքրուհի:Մաքրուհ
Աղավնի:Աղավն


LEXICON NameFamilyIFinalBase
Սաակաշվիլի:Սաակաշվիլի
Սահակաշվիլի:Սահակաշվիլի
Արշակունի:Արշակունի
Բագրատունի:Բագրատունի
LEXICON NameFamilyIFinalReduced
Սաակաշվիլի:Սաակաշվիլ
Սահակաշվիլի:Սահակաշվիլ
Արշակունի:Արշակուն
Բագրատունի:Բագրատուն
